District of Columbia statutes.
34-920

Testimony may be taken by deposition.

The Commission or any party may, in any investigation, cause the depositions of witnesses residing within or without the District of Columbia to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 985, ch. 150, § 8, par. 50
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 163(i)(1)
1973 Ed., § 43-420.
1981 Ed., § 43-621.